North Carolina, session 2025, HB229.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health
Benefits, shall amend the Medicaid State Plan to set and adjust rates for all services provided by
licensed ambulatory surgical centers so that these services are reimbursed at a rate of at least
ninety-five percent (95%) of the Medicare Ambulatory Surgical Centers fee schedule in effect as
of January 1 of each year, as published by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
(CMS). The initial rate adjustments shall be effective on the effective date approved by CMS for
the State Plan amendment.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, the sum of ten million four hundred
seventy-six thousand dollars ($10,476,000) in recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027
fiscal biennium to be used to implement the changes required under this act. These funds shall
provide a State match for nineteen million one hundred thirty-five thousand dollars
($19,135,000) in recurring federal funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, and
those funds are appropriated to the Division of Health Benefits for this same purpose.
SECTION 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
*H229-v-1*